Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1228.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4.1(a) of the act of May 23, 1945 (P.L.913, No.367), known as the Engineer, Land Surveyor and Geologist Registration Law, is amended to read:Section 4.1. State Registration Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors and Geologists.--(a) There is hereby established within the Department of State the State 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 Registration Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors and Geologists. The board shall consist of the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs, three members appointed by the Governor who shall be persons representing the public at large and nine members appointed by the Governor, five of whom shall be registered professional engineers, two of whom shall be registered professional land surveyors and two of whom shall be registered professional geologists. Any land surveyor appointed to serve on the board shall have received the land surveyor license upon the passage of the appropriate examination. Any geologist licensed under section 4.4 of this act shall be eligible for appointment to the board. The professional members of the board shall be so selected that not more than two of them shall specialize in any one of the five major disciplines of engineering: civil, mining and metallurgical, mechanical, electrical and chemical. Each member of the board shall be a [citizen of the United States and a] resident of this Commonwealth. Each professional member shall have been engaged in the practice of the respective profession for at least ten years and shall have been in responsible charge of work for at least five years.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1228PN1444 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223